Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVII Economic Security and Public Welfare
CHAPTER 202A Hospitalization of the Mentally Ill
202A.0819.
Due process and support requirements — Conduct of hearing — Ruling on petition — Reports.

At a hearing and at all stages of a proceeding for court-ordered assisted outpatient treatment, the respondent shall be:

Represented by counsel;

Accompanied by a peer support specialist or other person in a support relationship, if requested by the respondent; and

Afforded an opportunity to present evidence, call witnesses on his or her behalf, and cross-examine adverse witnesses.

If a respondent does not appear at the hearing, and appropriate attempts to elicit the respondent’s appearance have failed, the court may conduct the hearing in the respondent’s absence.

A qualified mental health professional who recommends court-ordered assisted outpatient treatment for the respondent shall:

Testify at the hearing, in person or via electronic means;

State the facts and clinical determinations which support the allegation that the respondent meets the criteria stated in KRS 202A.0815; and

Testify in support of the treatment plan provided pursuant to KRS 202A.0817, and for each category of proposed evidence-based treatment, he or she shall state the specific recommendation and the clinical basis for his or her belief that such treatment is essential to the maintenance of the respondent’s health or safety.

If after hearing all relevant evidence, the court does not find by clear and convincing evidence that the respondent meets the criteria stated in KRS 202A.0815, the court shall deny the petition and the proceedings against the respondent shall be dismissed.

If after hearing all relevant evidence, the court finds by clear and convincing evidence that the respondent meets the criteria stated in KRS 202A.0815, the court may order the respondent to receive assisted outpatient treatment for a period of time not to exceed three hundred sixty (360) days. The court’s order shall incorporate a treatment plan, which shall be limited in scope to the recommendations included in the treatment plan provided by the qualified mental health professional pursuant to KRS 202A.0817.

The court shall report every order for assisted outpatient treatment issued under this section to the Department for Behavioral Health, Developmental and Intellectual Disabilities.

HISTORY:
2017 ch. 154, § 7, effective June 29, 2017; 2019 ch. 128, § 2, effective June 27, 2019.

202A.0821.
Appointment of outpatient provider agency.

If the court orders assisted outpatient mental health treatment pursuant to KRS 202A.0819, the court shall appoint an outpatient provider agency recognized by the cabinet which shall assemble a multidisciplinary team. The multidisciplinary team shall regularly monitor the person’s adherence to the conditions of the order and regularly report this information to the court that ordered the person’s release. Reports may be provided in written format, in person, or via electronic means, at the court’s discretion.

HISTORY:
2017 ch. 154, § 8, effective June 29, 2017.

202A.0823.
Substantial failure to comply with court-ordered assisted outpatient treatment.

A person’s substantial failure to comply with a court order for assisted outpatient treatment may constitute presumptive grounds for an authorized staff physician to order a seventy-two (72) hour emergency admission pursuant to KRS 202A.031. Failure to comply with an order for assisted outpatient treatment shall not be grounds to find the person in contempt of court.

HISTORY:
2017 ch. 154, § 9, effective June 29, 2017.

202A.0825.
Stay, vacation, or modification of court-ordered assisted outpatient treatment.

At any time during the period of an order for court-ordered assisted outpatient treatment, the person subject to the order may move the court to stay, vacate, or modify the order.

As used in this subsection, “material change” means an addition or deletion of a category of services to or from a treatment plan.
(2) (a)

As used in this subsection, “material change” means an addition or deletion of a category of services to or from a treatment plan.

If a treating qualified mental health professional proposes a material change to the court-ordered treatment plan, he or she shall apply to the court for approval of the proposed change. Not later than five (5) days after receiving the application, excluding weekends and holidays, the court shall hold a hearing. If the person under order informs the court that he or she agrees to the proposed material change, the court may approve such change without a hearing.

Within thirty (30) days of the expiration of an order for assisted outpatient treatment, the original petitioner may petition the court for an additional period of court-ordered assisted outpatient treatment. The procedures for the consideration of the petition shall be identical to the procedures provided in KRS 202A.0811 to 202A.0831, except that the parties may mutually agree to waive the requirement of a new hearing. The person under order shall be represented by an attorney in responding to the petition for an additional period of court-ordered assisted outpatient treatment.

HISTORY:
2017 ch. 154, § 10, effective June 29, 2017.

202A.0827.
Medicaid eligibility of court-ordered assisted outpatient treatment.

For persons who are Medicaid-eligible, assisted outpatient mental health treatment services identified under KRS 202A.0811 to 202A.0831 shall be authorized by the Department for Medicaid Services and its contractors as Medicaid-eligible services and shall be subject to the same medical necessity criteria and reimbursement methodology as for all other covered behavioral health services.

HISTORY:
2017 ch. 154, § 11, effective June 29, 2017.

202A.0829.
Adequate funding required for implementation of KRS 202A.0811 to 202A.0831.

Implementation of KRS 202A.0811 to 202A.0831 is contingent upon adequate funding by any unit of state or local government or divisions thereof, special purpose governmental entity, or any other entity able to utilize funds for the purposes set forth in KRS 202A.0811 to 202A.0831. Funding may be provided through the appropriation of federal, state, or local resources or from donations, grants, gifts, or pledges from private resources.

HISTORY:
2017 ch. 154, § 12, effective June 29, 2017.

202A.0831.
Short title for KRS 202A.0811 to 202A.0831.

KRS 202A.0811 to 202A.0831 may be cited as Tim’s Law.

HISTORY:
2017 ch. 154, § 13, effective June 29, 2017.

202A.085.
Proceedings deemed mental inquests — Commonwealth attorney and county attorney to represent Commonwealth. [Repealed.]

202A.090.
Form of certificate — Fee — Three-day limit. [Repealed.]

202A.091.
Confidentiality of court records — Expungement.

The court records of a respondent made in all proceedings pursuant to KRS Chapter 202A are hereby declared to be confidential and shall not be open to the general public for inspection except when such disclosure is provided in KRS 202A.016.

Following the discharge of a respondent from a treatment facility or the issuance of a court order denying a petition for a commitment, a respondent may at any time move to have all court records pertaining to the proceedings expunged from the files of the court. The county attorney shall be given notice of any such motion and shall have five (5) days in which to respond to same or request a hearing thereon.

Any person seeking information contained in the court files or the court records of proceedings involving persons under this chapter may file a written motion in the cause setting out why the information is needed. A District Judge may issue an order to disclose the information sought if he finds such order is appropriate under the circumstances and if he finds it is in the best interest of the person or of the public to have such information disclosed.

History.
Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 445, § 17, effective July 1, 1982.

202A.096.
Disclosure of communications.

There shall be no privilege as to any relevant communications between qualified mental health professionals and patients. Qualified mental health professionals are authorized to disclose communications relating to diagnosis and treatment of the patient’s mental condition in proceedings under this chapter.

History.
Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 445, § 31, effective July 1, 1982.

202A.100.
Notification of department — Transportation of patient. [Repealed.]

202A.101.
Notification of receiving hospital or psychiatric facility — Transportation of patient.

The court which orders any person to the receiving hospital or psychiatric facility, under the provisions of this chapter, shall at once notify the receiving hospital or psychiatric facility that such order has been made, advising of the sex and condition of the person.

After the facility has been so notified, the court shall order the sheriff of the county or other peace officer to transport the patient within forty-eight (48) hours (excluding weekends and holidays) from the county in which the person is located to the hospital or psychiatric facility designated by the cabinet. The sheriff or other peace officer may, upon agreement of a person authorized by the peace officer, authorize the cabinet, a private agency on contract with the cabinet, or an ambulance service designated by the cabinet to transport the person to the hospital.

The transportation costs of transporting a person to a hospital or psychiatric facility, when performed by a peace officer, an ambulance service, or other private agency on contract with the cabinet shall be paid by the cabinet in accordance with administrative regulation promulgated by the cabinet under the provisions of KRS Chapter 13A.

In returning any patient to the county from which the patient is sent, the transportation cost of the sheriff or other peace officer, the ambulance service, or the other agency on contract with the cabinet transporting the patient shall be paid as provided in KRS 202A.028(4), when necessary.

Whenever an individual is involuntarily hospitalized by a court order the patient shall be transported to the hospital designated by the cabinet and accompanied by the following documents:

A copy of the petition for involuntary hospitalization, unless hospitalization takes place pursuant to KRS 202A.041;

The certificate of qualified mental health professionals; and

The order of involuntary hospitalization.

The hospital may refuse to receive any person who has been ordered to be involuntarily hospitalized by a court order if the papers presented with such person at the hospital do not comply with the provisions of this chapter or if it does not receive notification of the order of involuntary hospitalization as required by this chapter.

History.
Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 445, § 20, effective July 1, 1982; 1994, ch. 498, § 7, effective July 15, 1994.

202A.110.
Examination by physician required within thirty-six hours. [Repealed.]

202A.120.
Conditions for discharge of involuntary patient. [Repealed.]

202A.121.
Right to counsel — Attorney’s right to access court records.

Upon the appearance of the person detained pursuant to KRS 202A.041 or upon the filing of a petition pursuant to KRS 202A.051, the court shall appoint an attorney to represent the respondent with such appointment and representation to continue unless the respondent retains private counsel. The appointed attorney shall be forthwith notified by the clerk of the allegations in the petition and the date and purpose of the preliminary hearing. Notwithstanding KRS 202A.091, an attorney appointed by the court or retained by the respondent shall be given access to the court records relating to the petition.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 445, § 8, effective July 1, 1982; 2017 ch. 158, § 26, effective June 29, 2017.

202A.130.
Conditions for release of involuntary patient on convalescent status — Rehospitalization. [Repealed.]

202A.131.
Right to be present.

The respondent shall be present at all hearings unless the respondent and his attorney intelligently waive respondent’s right to be present, or unless the court makes a specific finding after the respondent has been brought to the place of the hearing that the respondent should be removed from the hearing because his conduct is so disruptive that the proceedings cannot continue in any reasonable manner.

History.
Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 445, § 12, effective July 1, 1982.

202A.140.
Return of public charges from other states. [Repealed.]

202A.141.
Clarification of court orders — Appeals.

Hospitals ordered to receive an involuntarily hospitalized person shall have standing to petition the District Court for any necessary clarification or modification of orders or judgments entered in proceedings under this chapter and to appeal to the Circuit Court from final judgments or orders entered in proceedings which have not complied with the provisions of this chapter. A copy shall be sent to the involuntarily hospitalized person and the person’s attorney of record, if any, of whatever pleadings are filed by the hospital.

Appeals from the final orders or judgments of the District Court made and entered in proceedings under this chapter shall be taken in the same manner as other appeals from District Court to Circuit Court. This appeal shall be advanced on the Circuit Court docket without motion or notice.

History.
Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 445, § 15, effective July 1, 1982; 1994, ch. 498, § 8, effective July 15, 1994.

202A.150.
Hospital care or treatment by agency of United States. [Repealed.]

202A.151.
Writ of habeas corpus.

At any time, and without notice, a person detained at a facility, or a relative, friend, guardian, representative, or attorney on behalf of such person, may petition for a writ of habeas corpus to question the cause and legality of such detention and request that the Circuit Court issue a writ for release.

History.
Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 445, § 16, effective July 1, 1982.

202A.160.
Transfer to United States public health service or other agency. [Repealed.]

202A.161.
Timing of initial examination and report.

Any person admitted to a hospital pursuant to the provisions of this chapter shall be initially examined by an authorized staff physician of the hospital or, with permission of the facility’s governing body and in accordance with the applicable provisions of the facility’s medical staff bylaws, policies, and procedures, a physician assistant as defined in KRS 311.550, or an advanced practice registered nurse licensed under KRS Chapter 314 as soon as practicable but not later than thirty-six (36) hours (excluding weekends and holidays) and a report entered into the medical record not later than forty-eight (48) hours (excluding weekends and holidays) after his admission.

History.
Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 445, § 21, effective July 1, 1982; 2000, ch. 422, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2010, ch. 85, § 33, effective July 15, 2010.

202A.170.
Patients to be informed of rights. [Repealed.]

202A.171.
When discharge is required.

An authorized staff physician of a hospital shall discharge an involuntary patient when he no longer meets the criteria for involuntary hospitalization.

History.
Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 445, § 22, effective July 1, 1982.

202A.180.
Rules and regulations on patients’ rights, use of seclusion and restraints, transfer and release. [Repealed.]

202A.181.
Convalescent leave status.

An authorized staff physician may release an involuntary patient on convalescent leave status when the physician concludes that the patient would not present a danger or a threat of danger to self or others if provided with continued medical supervision in a less restrictive alternative mode of treatment. Release on convalescent leave status shall include notification to the hospitalizing court. Release on convalescent leave status does not terminate the involuntary hospitalization order and shall include provisions for the development of a treatment plan jointly by the hospital and by a provider of outpatient care for follow-up care by the provider and for the continual monitoring of that patient’s condition by the provider.

The hospital from which such patient is given convalescent leave status may at any time readmit the patient without additional court proceedings. If there is reason to believe that it is to the best interest of the patient to be rehospitalized, the secretary or an authorized staff physician of the hospital may issue an order for the immediate rehospitalization of the patient. Such an order, if not voluntarily complied with, shall, upon the endorsement by a judge of any court of the county in which the patient is a resident or is present, authorize any health or police officer to take the patient into custody and transport him to the responsible hospital. Notice of rehospitalization under this section shall be given to the originating court as soon as practicable and simultaneously with the order directing the rehospitalization if possible.

Release on convalescent leave status shall not apply to persons held under hospitalization orders arising out of KRS Chapter 504 unless consent of the appropriate court is obtained.

History.
Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 445, § 23, effective July 1, 1982; 1988, ch. 139, § 9, effective July 15, 1988.

202A.185.
Peace officer authorized to arrest and return patient to hospital.

If a patient undergoing involuntary treatment on an inpatient basis is absent from the hospital without, or in excess of authorization from the hospital staff, the person in charge or that person’s designee may contact the appropriate sheriff or other peace officers who shall take the patient into custody and return the patient to the hospital.

History.
Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 139, § 11, effective July 15, 1988.

202A.190.
Transfer of inmate to hospital or psychiatric facility. [Repealed.]

202A.191.
Rights of hospitalized patients.

Each and every patient hospitalized under this chapter shall have the following rights:

The right to be adequately informed as to their individual treatment program;

The right to assist in the planning of their treatment program;

The right to refuse treatment subject to the provisions of KRS 202A.196;

The right to maintain, keep, and use personal possessions and money;

The right to receive visitors;

The right to receive payment for work performed on behalf of the hospital;

The right to refuse intrusive treatment subject to the provisions of KRS 202A.196;

The right to be free from unreasonable use of seclusion and restraint;

The right to seek relief from participating in their treatment plan.

The secretary shall adopt rules and regulations for the proper administration and enforcement of this chapter. Such regulations shall be filed with the Legislative Research Commission as provided in KRS Chapter 13A.

History.
Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 445, § 27, effective July 1, 1982.

202A.196.
Hospital review committee — Treatment plan.

Every hospital approved under the provisions of this chapter shall have a review committee of three (3) qualified mental health professionals appointed by the hospital director. This review committee shall have the authority to review the appropriateness of a patient’s individual treatment plan.

Upon the refusal of an involuntary patient to participate in any or all aspects of his treatment plan, the review committee shall examine the appropriateness of the patient’s individual treatment plan. Within three (3) days of the refusal, the review committee shall meet with the patient and his counsel or other representative to discuss its recommendations.

If the patient still refuses to participate in any or all aspects of his individual treatment plan, the hospital may petition the District Court for a de novo determination of the appropriateness of the proposed treatment. Within seven (7) days, the court shall conduct a hearing, consistent with the patient’s rights to due process of law, and shall utilize the following factors in reaching its determination:

Whether the treatment is necessary to protect the patient or others from harm;

Whether the patient is incapable of giving informed consent to the proposed treatment;

Whether any less restrictive alternative treatment exists; and

Whether the proposed treatment carries any risk of permanent side effects.

Upon the completion of the hearing, the court shall enter an appropriate judgment.

History.
Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 445, § 28, effective July 1, 1982; 1988, ch. 139, § 12, effective July 15, 1988.

202A.200.
Exemption from personal liability. [Repealed.]

202A.201.
Mentally ill inmates.

When an inmate of any penal and correctional institution is reported by the staff of that institution to the Department of Corrections as being so mentally ill that he cannot be properly treated with the facilities at the disposal of the staff, the Department of Corrections shall have an examination conducted on the inmate by a mental health professional.

If this examination reveals that the inmate is mentally ill and appropriate treatment cannot be properly carried out in the institution in which he is incarcerated or within the facilities at the disposal of the Department of Corrections, the commissioner of the Department of Corrections may then request of the secretary of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services the inmate’s transfer to a hospital or forensic psychiatric facility. If the secretary of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services agrees that a transfer is necessary, the person shall be transferred to a Cabinet for Health and Family Services facility designated by the secretary of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services, where the person shall remain until the staff of the facility which received him advises the commissioner of the Department of Corrections that the person’s condition is such that he may be returned to the institution from which he came. No transfer shall be made to a correctional facility located on the grounds of a state mental hospital. The commissioner of the Department of Corrections shall then authorize his return. If the prisoner’s sentence expires during his stay in the facility and he is still in need of involuntary hospitalization, the staff of the facility shall petition the applicable District Court for further involuntary hospitalization of the patient under provisions of this chapter.

Prior to the issuance of an order of transfer and unless the prisoner voluntarily agrees to the transfer, the commissioner shall:

Send written notice to the prisoner that a transfer to a hospital or forensic psychiatric facility is being considered in sufficient time to permit the prisoner to prepare for the hearing;

Hold a hearing at which time the prisoner is made aware of the evidence being relied upon for the transfer and at which an opportunity to be heard in person and to present documentary evidence is given;

Provide an opportunity at the hearing to the prisoner to present testimony of witnesses and to confront and cross-examine witnesses called by the Department of Corrections, except upon a finding, not arbitrarily made, of good cause for not permitting the presentation;

Provide an independent decision maker who has not participated in the request for transfer to a hospital or forensic psychiatric facility;

Issue a written statement by the fact finder as to the evidence relied on and the reasons for transferring the prisoner; and

Provide effective and timely notice of all the foregoing rights.

During the time of the prisoner’s stay in a facility, his legal status as a prisoner shall remain unchanged until the termination of his sentence. The facility staff shall have no authority to parole, grant permission to visit relatives or friends outside the facility, or discharge the individual unless otherwise agreed to by the Department of Corrections. The time the prisoner spends in the facility shall be counted as a part of the prisoner’s sentence.

History.
Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 445, § 29, effective July 1, 1982; 1986, ch. 331, § 33, effective July 15, 1986; 1986, ch. 428, § 6, effective July 15, 1986; 1988, ch. 139, § 13, effective July 15, 1988; 1992, ch. 211, § 72, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 418, § 7, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 426, § 178, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 213, effective June 20, 2005.

202A.202.
Transfer of mentally ill patients or patients with an intellectual disability
between facilities.

The cabinet may transfer mentally ill patients or patients with an intellectual disability between hospitals, between hospitals and forensic psychiatric facilities, between hospitals and residential treatment centers for individuals with an intellectual disability, between residential treatment centers for individuals with an intellectual disability, and between residential treatment centers for individuals with an intellectual disability and forensic psychiatric facilities. A transfer shall be made upon the mutual agreement of the administrative officer, the officer’s designated representative or an authorized staff physician of each facility, if the agreement is based upon one (1) of the following findings by the officers, representatives or physicians:

That the transfer will improve the opportunities of the patient to receive care and treatment most likely to be of benefit to the patient;

That the transfer will permit the patient to receive care and treatment in the least restrictive alternative mode of treatment, considering the degree of danger or threat of danger to self or others which the patient presents; or

That the transfer is part of an individual treatment plan which has been reviewed and approved by a court.

The patient or his guardian or designated family member prior to transfer, shall receive notice of said proposed transfer and shall be allowed to challenge the transfer as part of his individual treatment plan under the provisions of KRS 202A.191, 202A.196, and KRS 210.270.

In an emergency situation where the patient presents a danger of serious injury or death to self or others within the institution so as to require immediate transfer to a more secure facility and which condition cannot be treated or resolved within a reasonable period of time in the present facility, the secretary may immediately transfer the patient to a more secure facility while the appeal provisions described in subsection (2) of this section are being carried out. In this event counsel shall be provided to the patient within three (3) days.

History.
Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 139, § 10, effective July 15, 1988; 2012, ch. 146, § 34, effective July 12, 2012.

202A.210.
Title. [Repealed.]

202A.211.
Return of Kentucky residents from other states.

Legal residents of the state who have become public charges in other states and have been returned to Kentucky because they have been involuntarily hospitalized may be immediately admitted to a hospital at the request of the secretary or his designated representative.

Within seventy-two (72) hours (excluding weekends and holidays) of the admission date, the staff of the hospital shall determine the need of the person for further hospitalization. If two (2) qualified mental health professionals, at least one (1) of whom is a physician, conclude that the patient shall be involuntarily hospitalized, they shall file in the appropriate court a certification requesting involuntary hospitalization procedures be initiated under the provisions of this chapter unless the patient has agreed to remain voluntarily.

History.
Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 445, § 24, effective July 1, 1982.

202A.220.
Applicability. [Repealed.]

202A.221.
Hospital care or treatment by agency of United States.

If an individual ordered to be hospitalized pursuant to this chapter is eligible for hospital care or treatment by any agency of the United States, the court, upon receipt of certificate from such agency showing that facilities are available and that the individual is eligible for care or treatment therein, may order him to be placed in the custody of such agency for hospitalization. When any such individual is admitted pursuant to the order of such court to any hospital or institution operated by any agency of the United States within or without the state, he shall be subject to the rules and regulations of such agency. The authorized staff physician of any hospital or institution operated by such agency and in which the individual is so hospitalized shall with respect to such individuals be vested with the same powers as the authorized staff physicians of hospitals within the state with respect to detention, custody, transfer, conditional release or discharge of patients. Jurisdiction is retained in the appropriate courts of this state at any time to inquire into the mental condition of an individual so hospitalized and to determine the necessity for continuance of the hospitalization, and every order of hospitalization issued pursuant to this section is so conditioned.

An order of court of competent jurisdiction of another state or the District of Columbia authorizing hospitalization of an individual by any agency of the United States shall have the same force and effect as to the individual while in this state as in the jurisdiction in which is situated the court entering the order; the courts or the district issuing the order shall be deemed to have retained jurisdiction of the individual so hospitalized for the purpose of inquiring into his mental condition and determining the necessity for continuance of his hospitalization as is provided in subsection (1) of this section with respect to individuals ordered hospitalized by the courts of this state. Consent is hereby given to the application of the law of the district in which is located the court issuing the order for hospitalization with respect to the authority of the chief officer of any hospital or institution operated in this state by any agency of the United States to retain custody, transfer, conditionally release, or discharge the individual hospitalized.

History.
Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 445, § 25, effective July 1, 1982.

202A.231.
Transfer to agency of United States.

Upon receipt of a certificate of the United States Public Health Service or such other agency of the United States government that facilities are available for the care or treatment of any person heretofore hospitalized in any mental hospital or other institution in this state for the care of mentally ill persons and that such person is eligible for such care or treatment, the secretary, upon recommendation by any such hospital or institution in this state, is hereby authorized to cause the transfer of any such person to the United States Public Health Service or other agency of the United States government for care or treatment. Upon effecting any such transfer, the hospitalizing court shall be notified thereof by the secretary.

Any person transferred as provided in this section shall be deemed to be placed in the custody of the United States Public Health Service or other agency of the United States government pursuant to the original hospitalization the same as if he had been originally so hospitalized.

No person shall be transferred to any agency of the United States if he be confined pursuant to conviction of any felony or misdemeanor or if he has been acquitted of the charge solely on the ground of mental illness unless prior to transfer the court issuing the confining order shall enter an order to transfer after the motion and hearing. Any person transferred as provided in this section to any agency of the United States shall be hospitalized by such agency pursuant to the original order of hospitalization.

History.
Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 445, § 26, effective July 1, 1982.

202A.241.
Use of least restrictive level of restraint — Guidelines for restrained person’s need for privacy and ability to use telephone.

All individuals transporting or holding persons under KRS Chapter 202A, 202B, or 645, shall use the least restrictive level of restraint consistent with the person’s needs. The Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall promulgate administrative regulations subject to the provisions of KRS Chapter 13A which shall include guidelines addressing the person’s need for privacy, particularly when being restrained, and the person’s ability to communicate by phone at the earliest opportunity available.

History.
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 498, § 21, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 426, § 179, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 214, effective June 20, 2005.

202A.251.
Prohibition against detention in jail without criminal charges pending — Criminal charges not to be placed to avoid transportation.

No person held under the provisions of this chapter shall be detained in jail unless criminal charges are also pending. No peace officer or any other person shall place criminal charges against a person who is mentally ill and in need of hospitalization pursuant to this chapter solely or primarily for the purpose of avoiding transporting the person to a hospital or psychiatric facility.

History.
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 498, § 9, effective July 15, 1994.

202A.261.
Certain hospitals not to be required to provide services.

No public or private hospital, other than a state-operated or contracted mental hospital or institution, shall be required to provide services under KRS 202A.008, 202A.011, 202A.028, 202A.041, 202A.051, 202A.071, 202A.081, 202A.0811 to 202A.0831, 202A.101, 202A.141, 202A.241, 202A.251, 202A.261, 202A.271, 202B.170, 202B.200, 387.540, 504.085, 600.020, 645.020, 645.120, and 645.280 unless the hospital agrees to provide the services. Any hospital shall make every reasonable attempt to cooperate with the implementation of KRS 202A.008, 202A.011, 202A.028, 202A.041, 202A.051, 202A.071, 202A.081, 202A.101, 202A.141, 202A.241, 202A.251, 202A.261, 202A.271, 202B.170, 202B.200, 387.540, 504.085, 600.020, 645.020, 645.120, and 645.280.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 498, § 10, effective July 15, 1994; 2017 ch. 154, § 1, effective June 29, 2017.

202A.271.
Rates for payment for provision of hospital services.

Each public or private hospital, other than a state-operated or contracted mental hospital or institution, which provides services under KRS 202A.008, 202A.011, 202A.028, 202A.041, 202A.051, 202A.071, 202A.081, 202A.0811 to 202A.0831, 202A.101, 202A.141, 202A.241, 202A.251, 202A.261, 202A.271, 202B.170, 202B.200, 387.540, 504.085, 600.020, 645.020, 645.120, and 645.280 shall be paid for the services at the same rates the hospital negotiates with the Department for Behavioral Health, Developmental and Intellectual Disabilities or the regional community program for mental health and for individuals with an intellectual disability.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 498, § 11, effective July 15, 1994; 2012, ch. 146, § 35, effective July 12, 2012; 2012, ch. 158, § 24, effective July 12, 2012; 2017 ch. 154, § 2, effective June 29, 2017.

202A.301.
Exemption from personal liability.

Persons carrying out duties or rendering professional opinions as provided in this chapter shall be free of personal liability for such actions, provided that such activities are performed in good faith within the scope of their professional duties and in a manner consistent with accepted professional practices.

History.
Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 445, § 30, effective July 1, 1982.

202A.400.
Duty of mental health professional to warn intended victim of patient’s threat of violence.

No monetary liability and no cause of action shall arise against any mental health professional for failing to predict, warn of or take precautions to provide protection from a patient’s violent behavior, unless the patient has communicated to the mental health professional an actual threat of physical violence against a clearly identified or reasonably identifiable victim, or unless the patient has communicated to the mental health professional an actual threat of some specific violent act.

The duty to warn of or to take reasonable precautions to provide protection from violent behavior arises only under the limited circumstances specified in subsection (1) of this section. The duty to warn a clearly or reasonably identifiable victim shall be discharged by the mental health professional if reasonable efforts are made to communicate the threat to the victim, and to notify the police department closest to the patient’s and the victim’s residence of the threat of violence. When the patient has communicated to the mental health professional an actual threat of some specific violent act and no particular victim is identifiable, the duty to warn has been discharged if reasonable efforts are made to communicate the threat to law enforcement authorities. The duty to take reasonable precaution to provide protection from violent behavior shall be satisfied if reasonable efforts are made to seek civil commitment of the patient under this chapter.

No monetary liability and no cause of action shall arise against any mental health professional for confidences disclosed to third parties in an effort to discharge a duty arising under subsection (1) of this section according to the provisions of subsection (2) of this section.

For purposes of this section:

“Mental health professional” means:

A physician licensed under the laws of Kentucky to practice medicine or osteopathy, or a medical officer of the government of the United States while engaged in conducting mental health services;

A psychiatrist licensed under the laws of Kentucky to practice medicine or osteopathy, or a medical officer of the government of the United States engaged in conducting mental health services;

A psychologist, a psychological practitioner, a certified psychologist, or a psychological associate, licensed under the provisions of KRS Chapter 319;

A registered nurse licensed under the provisions of KRS Chapter 314 engaged in providing mental health services;

A licensed clinical social worker licensed under the provisions of KRS 335.100, or a certified social worker licensed under the provisions of KRS 335.080 engaged in providing mental health services;

A marriage and family therapist licensed under the provisions of KRS 335.300 to 335.399 engaged in providing mental health services;

A professional counselor credentialed under the provisions of KRS Chapter 335.500 to 335.599 engaged in providing mental health services;

An art therapist certified under KRS 309.130 engaged in providing mental health services; or

A pastoral counselor licensed under the provisions of KRS 335.600 to 335.699 engaged in providing mental health services; and

“Patient” has the same meaning as in KRS 202A.011, except that it also includes a person currently under the outpatient care or treatment of a mental health professional.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 348, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 2002, ch. 99, § 3, effective March 28, 2002; 2014, ch. 64, § 1, effective July 15, 2014; 2015 ch. 61, § 1, effective June 24, 2015.